test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-joki_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - joki - ok : # Noun 'river' - ok
     joki+N+Sg+Nom: joki
     joki+N+Sg+Gen: joven
     joki+N+Sg+Par: jokkee
     joki+N+Sg+Tra: joveksi
     joki+N+Sg+Abe: jovetta
     joki+N+Sg+Ine: jovessa
     joki+N+Sg+Ela: jovesta
     joki+N+Sg+Ill: jokheen
     joki+N+Sg+Ade: jovela
     joki+N+Sg+Abl: jovelta
     joki+N+Sg+All: jovele
     joki+N+Sg+Ess: jokena
     joki+N+Pl+Nom: jovet
     joki+N+Pl+Gen: jokkiin
     joki+N+Pl+Par: jokkii
     joki+N+Pl+Tra: joviksi
     joki+N+Pl+Abe: jovitta
     joki+N+Pl+Ine: jovissa
     joki+N+Pl+Ela: jovista
     joki+N+Pl+Ill: jokhiin
     joki+N+Pl+Ade: jovila
     joki+N+Pl+Abl: jovilta
     joki+N+Pl+All: jovile
     joki+N+Pl+Ess: jokina
     joki+N+Pl+Com: jokine
